Oklahoma, session 2025, SB665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728g of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act may be known and cited as the “Medical Ethics Defense


Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728h of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1567 Page 1


1. “Conscience” means the ethical, moral, or religious beliefs


or principles held by any medical practitioner, healthcare


institution, or healthcare payer. Conscience with respect to


institutional entities or corporate bodies, as opposed to individual


persons, is determined by reference to that entity or body’s


governing documents including, but not limited to, any published


ethical, moral, or religious guidelines or directives; mission


statements; constitutions; articles of incorporation; bylaws;


policies; or regulations;


2. “Disclosure” means a formal or informal communication or


transmission, but does not include a communication or transmission


concerning policy decisions that lawfully exercise discretionary


authority unless the medical practitioner providing the disclosure


or transmission reasonably believes that the disclosure or


transmission evinces:


a. any violation of any law, rule, or regulation,


b. any violation of any ethical guidelines for the


provision of any medical procedure or service, or


c. gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse


of authority, practices or methods of treatment that


may put patient health at risk, or a substantial and


specific danger to public health or safety;


3. “Discrimination” means any adverse action taken against, or


any threat of adverse action communicated to, any medical

Req. No. 1567 Page 2


practitioner, healthcare institution, or healthcare payer as a


result of his, her, or its decision to decline to participate in a


medical procedure or service on the basis of conscience.


Discrimination includes, but is not limited to, termination of


employment; transfer from current position; demotion from current


position; adverse administrative action; reassignment to a different


shift or job title; increased administrative duties; refusal of


staff privileges; refusal of board certification; loss of career


specialty; reduction of wages, benefits, or privileges; refusal to


award a grant, contract, or other program; refusal to provide


residency training opportunities; denial, deprivation, or


disqualification of licensure; withholding or disqualifying from


financial aid and other assistance; impediments to creating any


healthcare institution or payer or expanding or improving such


healthcare institution or payer; impediments to acquiring,


associating with, or merging with any other healthcare institution


or payer; the threat thereof with regard to any of the preceding; or


any other penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory action, whether


executed or threatened. However, discrimination excludes the


negotiation or purchase of insurance by a nongovernment entity;


4. “Medical procedure or service” means medical care provided


to any patient at any time over the entire course of treatment, or


medical research. This includes, but is not limited to, testing;


diagnosis; referral; dispensing and/or administering any drug,

Req. No. 1567 Page 3


medication, or device; psychological therapy or counseling;


research; prognosis; therapy; record-making procedures; notes


related to treatment; set up or performance of a surgery or


procedure; or any other care or service performed or provided by any


medical practitioner including, but not limited to, physicians,


nurses, allied health professionals, paraprofessionals, contractors,


or employees of healthcare institutions;


5. “Healthcare institution” means any organization,


corporation, partnership, association, agency, network, sole


proprietorship, joint venture, or other entity that provides medical


procedures or services. The term includes, but is not limited to,


any public or private hospital, clinic, medical center, physician


organization, professional association, ambulatory surgical center,


private physician’s office, pharmacy, nursing home, medical school,


nursing school, medical training facility, or any other entity or


location in which medical procedures or services are performed;


6. “Healthcare payer” means any employer, health plan, health


maintenance organization, insurance company, management services


organization, or any other entity that pays for, or arranges for the


payment of, any medical procedure or service provided to any


patient, whether that payment is made in whole or in part;


7. “Medical practitioner” means any person or individual who


may be or is asked to participate in any way in any medical


procedure or service. This includes, but is not limited to,

Req. No. 1567 Page 4


doctors, nurse practitioners, physician’s assistants, nurses,


nurses’ aides, allied health professionals, medical assistants,


hospital employees, clinic employees, nursing home employees,


pharmacists, pharmacy technicians and employees, medical school


faculty and students, nursing school faculty and students,


psychology and counseling faculty and students, medical researchers,


laboratory technicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, counselors,


mental health professionals, social workers, or any other person who


facilitates or participates in the provision of a medical procedure


or service;


8. “Participate” in a medical procedure or service means to


provide, perform, assist with, facilitate, refer for, counsel for,


advise with regard to, admit for the purposes of providing, or take


part in any way in providing any medical procedure or service, or


any form of such service; and


9. “Pay” or “payment” means to pay for, contract for, arrange


for the payment of (whether in whole or in part), reimburse, or


remunerate.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728i of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Freedom of Conscience. A medical practitioner, healthcare


institution, or healthcare payer has the right not to participate in



Req. No. 1567 Page 5


or pay for any medical procedure or service which violates his, her,


or its conscience.


B. Limitations. The exercise of the right of conscience is


limited to conscience-based objections to a particular medical


procedure or service. This section may not be construed to waive or


modify any duty a health care practitioner, health care institution,


or health care payer may have to provide other medical procedures or


services that do not violate the practitioner’s, institution’s, or


payer’s conscience.


C. Immunity from Liability. No medical practitioner,


healthcare institution, or healthcare payer shall be civilly,


criminally, or administratively liable for exercising his, her, or


its right of conscience not to participate in or pay for a medical


procedure or service. No healthcare institution shall be civilly,


criminally, or administratively liable for the exercise of


conscience rights not to participate in a medical procedure or


service by a medical practitioner employed, contracted, or granted


admitting privileges by the healthcare institution.


D. Discrimination. No medical practitioner, healthcare


institution, or healthcare payer shall be discriminated against in


any manner as a result of his, her, or its decision to decline to


participate in or pay for a medical procedure or service on the


basis of conscience.



Req. No. 1567 Page 6


E. Exception. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act


to the contrary, a religious medical practitioner, healthcare


institution, or healthcare payer that holds itself out to the public


as religious, states in its governing documents that it has a


religious purpose or mission, and has internal operating policies or


procedures that implement its religious beliefs shall have the right


to make employment, staffing, contracting, and admitting privilege


decisions consistent with its religious beliefs.


F. Opt-In Required. A health care practitioner may not be


scheduled for, assigned, or requested to directly or indirectly


perform, facilitate, refer for, or participate in an abortion unless


the practitioner first affirmatively consents in writing to perform,


facilitate, refer for, or participate in the abortion. This


subsection does not establish a right to participate in an abortion


otherwise prohibited by law.


G. Emergency Medical Treatments. Nothing herein shall be


construed to override the requirement to provide emergency medical


treatment to all patients set forth in 42 U.S.C., Section 1395dd.


Medical emergencies shall be subject to the definitions and


requirements of Section 1-731.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728j of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1567 Page 7


A. No medical practitioner shall be discriminated against in


any manner because the medical practitioner:


1. Provided, caused to be provided, or is about to provide or


cause to be provided to his or her employer, the Attorney General,


any state agency charged with protecting healthcare rights of


conscience, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, Office


for Civil Rights, or any other federal agency charged with


protecting healthcare rights of conscience information relating to


any violation of, or any act or omission the medical practitioner


reasonably believes to be a violation of, any provision of this act;


2. Testified or is about to testify in a proceeding concerning


such violation; or


3. Assisted or participated, or is about to assist or


participate, in such a proceeding.


B. Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited by law, no


medical practitioner shall be discriminated against in any manner


because the medical practitioner disclosed any information that the


medical practitioner reasonably believes evinces:


1. Any violation of any law, rule, or regulation;


2. Any violation of any ethical guidelines for the provision of


any medical procedure or service; or


3. Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of


authority, practices or methods of treatment that may put patient



Req. No. 1567 Page 8


health at risk, or a substantial and specific danger to public


health or safety.


C. A licensing board may not reprimand, sanction, or revoke or


threaten to revoke a license, certificate, or registration of a


healthcare practitioner for engaging in speech or expressive


activity protected under the First Amendment to the United States


Constitution, unless the licensing board demonstrates beyond a


reasonable doubt that the practitioner’s speech was the direct cause


of physical harm to a person with whom the healthcare practitioner


had a practitioner-patient relationship within the three (3) years


immediately preceding the incident of physical harm.


1. The licensing board must provide a medical practitioner with


any complaints it has received which may result in the revocation of


the medical practitioner’s license, certification, or registration,


within seven (7) days after receipt of the complaint.


2. The licensing board must pay the medical practitioner an


administrative penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each


day the complaint is not provided to the medical practitioner after


the specified seven (7) days.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728k of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Civil Action for Violation of Right of Conscience. A civil


action for damages or injunctive relief, or both, may be brought by

Req. No. 1567 Page 9


any medical practitioner, healthcare institution, or healthcare


payer for any violation of any provision of this act. Any


additional burden or expense on another medical practitioner,


healthcare institution, or healthcare payer arising from the


exercise of the right of conscience shall not be a defense to any


violation of this act. However, no civil action may be brought


against an individual who declines to use or purchase medical


procedure or services from a specific medical practitioner,


healthcare institution, or healthcare payer for exercising the


rights granted in subsection A of Section 3 of this act.


B. Other Remedies. Any party aggrieved by any violation of


this act may commence a civil action and shall be entitled, upon the


finding of a violation, to recover threefold his, her, or its actual


damages sustained, along with the costs of the action and reasonable


attorney fees. Such damages shall be cumulative and in no way


limited by any other remedies which may be available under any other


federal, state, or municipal law. A court considering such civil


action may also award injunctive relief, which may include, but is


not limited to, reinstatement of a medical practitioner to his or


her previous position, reinstatement of board certification, and re-


licensure of a healthcare institution or healthcare payer.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728l of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1567 Page 10


Any provision of this act held to be invalid or unenforceable by


its terms, or as applied to any person or circumstance, shall be


construed so as to give it the maximum effect permitted by law,


unless such holding shall be one of utter invalidity or


unenforceability, in which event such provision shall be deemed


severable herefrom and shall not affect the remainder hereof or the


application of such provision to other persons not similarly


situated or to other, dissimilar circumstances.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1567 DC 1/19/2025 5:40:59 AM



























Req. No. 1567 Page 11